Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,175
Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act; complaint; applicability.

The Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Postsecondary Education Act does not prohibit a person asserting a claim for discrimination in employment or the conditions thereof from filing a complaint pursuant to the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act. Filing a complaint pursuant to the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act constitutes a waiver of any right to seek relief pursuant to the Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Postsecondary Education Act, and filing a complaint pursuant to the Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Postsecondary Education Act constitutes a waiver of any right to seek relief pursuant to the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1095.

Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act, see section 48-1125.